Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1318
Inspection and testing of materials.

The department shall have the authority to make tests, do research, to inspect and test all materials, supplies, equipment, and machinery used for state purposes or projects involving federal funds, and to develop methods and procedures for this purpose.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 18, p. 425.